Ohio, session 136, HB929.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO: Section 1. That sections 4501.01, 4503.10, 4503.103, 4503.107, 4506.14, 4507.09, and 4507.501 of the Revised Code be amended to read as follows: Sec. 4501.01. As used in this chapter and Chapters 4503., 4505., 4507., 4509., 4510., 4513., 4515., and 4517. of the Revised Code, and in the penal laws, except as otherwise provided: (A) "Vehicles" means everything on wheels or runners, including motorized bicycles, but does not mean electric personal assistive mobility devices, low-speed micromobility devices, vehicles that are operated exclusively on rails or tracks or from overhead electric trolley wires, and vehicles that belong to any police department, municipal fire department, or volunteer fire department, or that are used by such a department in the discharge of its functions. (B) "Motor vehicle" means any vehicle, including mobile homes and recreational vehicles, that is propelled or drawn by power other than muscular power or power collected from overhead electric trolley wires. "Motor vehicle" does not include utility vehicles as defined in division (VV) of this section, under-speed vehicles as defined in division (XX) of this section, mini-trucks as defined in division (BBB) of this section, motorized bicycles, electric bicycles, road rollers, traction engines, power shovels, power cranes, and other equipment used in construction work and not designed for or employed in general highway transportation, well-drilling machinery, ditch-digging machinery, farm machinery, and trailers that are designed and used exclusively to transport a boat between a place of storage and a marina, or in and around a marina, when drawn or towed on a public road or highway for a distance of no more than ten miles and at a speed of twenty-five miles per hour or less. (C) "Agricultural tractor" and "traction engine" mean any self-propelling vehicle that is designed or used for drawing other vehicles or wheeled machinery, but has no provisions for carrying loads independently of such other vehicles, and that is used principally for agricultural purposes. (D) "Commercial tractor," except as defined in division (C) of this section, means any motor vehicle that has motive power and either is designed or used for drawing other motor vehicles, or is designed or used for drawing another motor vehicle while carrying a portion of the other motor vehicle or its load, or both. (E) "Passenger car" means any motor vehicle that is designed and used for carrying not more than nine persons and includes any motor vehicle that is designed and used for carrying not more than fifteen persons in a ridesharing arrangement. (F) "Collector's vehicle" means any motor vehicle or agricultural tractor or traction engine that is of special interest, that has a fair market value of one hundred dollars or more, whether operable or not, and that is owned, operated, collected, preserved, restored, maintained, or used essentially as a collector's item, leisure pursuit, or investment, but not as the owner's principal means of transportation. "Licensed collector's vehicle" means a collector's vehicle, other than an agricultural tractor or traction engine, that displays current, valid license tags issued under section 4503.45 of the Revised Code, or a similar type of motor vehicle that displays current, valid license tags issued under substantially equivalent provisions in the laws of other states. (G) "Historical motor vehicle" means any motor vehicle that is over twenty-five years old and is owned solely as a collector's item and for participation in club activities, exhibitions, tours, parades, and similar uses, but that in no event is used for general transportation. (H) "Noncommercial motor vehicle" means any motor vehicle, including a farm truck as defined in section 4503.04 of the Revised Code, that is designed by the manufacturer to carry a load of no more than one ton and is used exclusively for purposes other than engaging in business for profit. (I) "Bus" means any motor vehicle that has motor power and is designed and used for carrying more than nine passengers, except any motor vehicle that is designed and used for carrying not more than fifteen passengers in a ridesharing arrangement. (J) "Commercial car" or "truck" means any motor vehicle that has motor power and is designed and used for carrying merchandise or freight, or that is used as a commercial tractor. (K) "Bicycle" has the same meaning as in section 4511.01 of the Revised Code. (L) "Motorized bicycle" or "moped" means any vehicle that either has two tandem wheels or one wheel in the front and two wheels in the rear, that may be pedaled, and that is equipped with a helper motor of not more than fifty cubic centimeters piston displacement that produces no more than one brake horsepower and is capable of propelling the vehicle at a speed of no greater than twenty miles per hour on a level surface. "Motorized bicycle" or "moped" does not include an electric bicycle. (M) "Trailer" means any vehicle without motive power that is designed or used for carrying property or persons wholly on its own structure and for being drawn by a motor vehicle, and includes any such vehicle that is formed by or operated as a combination of a semitrailer and a vehicle of the dolly type such as that commonly known as a trailer dolly, a vehicle used to transport agricultural produce or agricultural production materials between a local place of storage or supply and the farm when drawn or towed on a public road or highway at a speed greater than twenty-five miles per hour, and a vehicle that is designed and used exclusively to transport a boat between a place of storage and a marina, or in and around a marina, when drawn or towed on a public road or highway for a distance of more than ten miles or at a speed of more than twenty-five miles per hour. "Trailer" does not include a manufactured home or travel trailer. (N) "Noncommercial trailer" means any trailer, except a travel trailer or trailer that is used to transport a boat as described in division (B) of this section, but, where applicable, includes a vehicle that is used to transport a boat as described in division (M) of this section, that has a gross weight of no more than ten thousand pounds, and that is used exclusively for purposes other than engaging in business for a profit, such as the transportation of personal items for personal or recreational purposes. (O) "Mobile home" means a building unit or assembly of closed construction that is fabricated in an off-site facility, is more than thirty-five body feet in length or, when erected on site, is three hundred twenty or more square feet, is built on a permanent chassis, is transportable in one or more sections, and does not qualify as a manufactured home as defined in division (C)(4) of section 3781.06 of the Revised Code or as an industrialized unit as defined in division (C)(3) of section 3781.06 of the Revised Code. (P) "Semitrailer" means any vehicle of the trailer type that does not have motive power and is so designed or used with another and separate motor vehicle that in operation a part of its own weight or that of its load, or both, rests upon and is carried by the other vehicle furnishing the motive power for propelling itself and the vehicle referred to in this division, and includes, for the purpose only of registration and taxation under those chapters, any vehicle of the dolly type, such as a trailer dolly, that is designed or used for the conversion of a semitrailer into a trailer. (Q) "Recreational vehicle" means a vehicular portable structure that meets all of the following conditions: (1) It is designed for the sole purpose of recreational travel. (2) It is not used for the purpose of engaging in business for profit. (3) It is not used for the purpose of engaging in intrastate commerce. (4) It is not used for the purpose of commerce as defined in 49 C.F.R. 383.5, as amended. (5) It is not regulated by the public utilities commission pursuant to Chapter 4905., 4921., or 4923. of the Revised Code. (6) It is classed as one of the following: (a) "Travel trailer" or "house vehicle" means a nonself-propelled recreational vehicle that does not exceed an overall length of forty feet, exclusive of bumper and tongue or coupling. "Travel trailer" includes a tent-type fold-out camping trailer as defined in section 4517.01 of the Revised Code. (b) "Motor home" means a self-propelled recreational vehicle that has no fifth wheel and is constructed with permanently installed facilities for cold storage, cooking and consuming of food, and for sleeping. (c) "Truck camper" means a nonself-propelled recreational vehicle that does not have wheels for road use and is designed to be placed upon and attached to a motor vehicle. "Truck camper" does not include truck covers that consist of walls and a roof, but do not have floors and facilities enabling them to be used as a dwelling. (d) "Fifth wheel trailer" means a vehicle that is of such size and weight as to be movable without a special highway permit, that is constructed with a raised forward section that allows a bi-level floor plan, and that is designed to be towed by a vehicle equipped with a fifth-wheel hitch ordinarily installed in the bed of a truck. (e) "Park trailer" means a vehicle that is commonly known as a park model recreational vehicle, meets the American national standard institute standard A119.5 (1988) for park trailers, is built on a single chassis, has a gross trailer area of four hundred square feet or less when set up, is designed for seasonal or temporary living quarters, and may be connected to utilities necessary for the operation of installed features and appliances. (R) "Pneumatic tires" means tires of rubber and fabric or tires of similar material, that are inflated with air. (S) "Solid tires" means tires of rubber or similar elastic material that are not dependent upon confined air for support of the load. (T) "Solid tire vehicle" means any vehicle that is equipped with two or more solid tires. (U) "Farm machinery" means all machines and tools that are used in the production, harvesting, and care of farm products, and includes trailers that are used to transport agricultural produce or agricultural production materials between a local place of storage or supply and the farm, agricultural tractors, threshing machinery, hay-baling machinery, corn shellers, hammermills, and machinery used in the production of horticultural, agricultural, and vegetable products. (V) "Owner" includes any person or firm, other than a manufacturer or dealer, that has title to a motor vehicle, except that, in sections 4505.01 to 4505.19 of the Revised Code, "owner" includes in addition manufacturers and dealers. (W) "Manufacturer" and "dealer" include all persons and firms that are regularly engaged in the business of manufacturing, selling, displaying, offering for sale, or dealing in motor vehicles, at an established place of business that is used exclusively for the purpose of manufacturing, selling, displaying, offering for sale, or dealing in motor vehicles. A place of business that is used for manufacturing, selling, displaying, offering for sale, or dealing in motor vehicles shall be deemed to be used exclusively for those purposes even though snowmobiles or all-purpose vehicles are sold or displayed for sale thereat, even though farm machinery is sold or displayed for sale thereat, or even though repair, accessory, gasoline and oil, storage, parts, service, or paint departments are maintained thereat, or, in any county having a population of less than seventy-five thousand at the last federal census, even though a department in a place of business is used to dismantle, salvage, or rebuild motor vehicles by means of used parts, if such departments are operated for the purpose of furthering and assisting in the business of manufacturing, selling, displaying, offering for sale, or dealing in motor vehicles. Places of business or departments in a place of business used to dismantle, salvage, or rebuild motor vehicles by means of using used parts are not considered as being maintained for the purpose of assisting or furthering the manufacturing, selling, displaying, and offering for sale or dealing in motor vehicles. (X) "Operator" includes any person who drives or operates a motor vehicle upon the public highways. (Y) "Chauffeur" means any operator who operates a motor vehicle, other than a taxicab, as an employee for hire; or any operator whether or not the owner of a motor vehicle, other than a taxicab, who operates such vehicle for transporting, for gain, compensation, or profit, either persons or property owned by another. Any operator of a motor vehicle who is voluntarily involved in a ridesharing arrangement is not considered an employee for hire or operating such vehicle for gain, compensation, or profit. (Z) "State" includes the territories and federal districts of the United States, and the provinces of Canada. (AA) "Public roads and highways" for vehicles includes all public thoroughfares, bridges, and culverts. (BB) "Manufacturer's number" means the manufacturer's original serial number that is affixed to or imprinted upon the chassis or other part of the motor vehicle. (CC) "Motor number" means the manufacturer's original number that is affixed to or imprinted upon the engine or motor of the vehicle. (DD) "Distributor" means any person who is authorized by a motor vehicle manufacturer to distribute new motor vehicles to licensed motor vehicle dealers at an established place of business that is used exclusively for the purpose of distributing new motor vehicles to licensed motor vehicle dealers, except when the distributor also is a new motor vehicle dealer, in which case the distributor may distribute at the location of the distributor's licensed dealership. (EE) "Ridesharing arrangement" means the transportation of persons in a motor vehicle where the transportation is incidental to another purpose of a volunteer driver and includes ridesharing arrangements known as carpools, vanpools, and buspools. (FF) "Apportionable vehicle" means any vehicle that is used or intended for use in two or more international registration plan member jurisdictions that allocate or proportionally register vehicles, that is used for the transportation of persons for hire or designed, used, or maintained primarily for the transportation of property, and that meets any of the following qualifications: (1) Is a power unit having a gross vehicle weight in excess of twenty-six thousand pounds; (2) Is a power unit having three or more axles, regardless of the gross vehicle weight; (3) Is a combination vehicle with a gross vehicle weight in excess of twenty-six thousand pounds. "Apportionable vehicle" does not include recreational vehicles, vehicles displaying restricted plates, city pick-up and delivery vehicles, or vehicles owned and operated by the United States, this state, or any political subdivisions thereof. (GG) "Chartered party" means a group of persons who contract as a group to acquire the exclusive use of a passenger-carrying motor vehicle at a fixed charge for the vehicle in accordance with the carrier's tariff, lawfully on file with the United States department of transportation, for the purpose of group travel to a specified destination or for a particular itinerary, either agreed upon in advance or modified by the chartered group after having left the place of origin. (HH) "International registration plan" means a reciprocal agreement of member jurisdictions that is endorsed by the American association of motor vehicle administrators, and that promotes and encourages the fullest possible use of the highway system by authorizing apportioned registration of fleets of vehicles and recognizing registration of vehicles apportioned in member jurisdictions. (II) "Restricted plate" means a license plate that has a restriction of time, geographic area, mileage, or commodity, and includes license plates issued to farm trucks under division (J) of section 4503.04 of the Revised Code. (JJ) "Gross vehicle weight," with regard to any commercial car, trailer, semitrailer, or bus that is taxed at the rates established under section 4503.042 or 4503.65 of the Revised Code, means the unladen weight of the vehicle fully equipped plus the maximum weight of the load to be carried on the vehicle. (KK) "Combined gross vehicle weight" with regard to any combination of a commercial car, trailer, and semitrailer, that is taxed at the rates established under section 4503.042 or 4503.65 of the Revised Code, means the total unladen weight of the combination of vehicles fully equipped plus the maximum weight of the load to be carried on that combination of vehicles. (LL) "Chauffeured limousine" means a motor vehicle that is designed to carry nine or fewer passengers and is operated for hire pursuant to a prearranged contract for the transportation of passengers on public roads and highways along a route under the control of the person hiring the vehicle and not over a defined and regular route. "Prearranged contract" means an agreement, made in advance of boarding, to provide transportation from a specific location in a chauffeured limousine. "Chauffeured limousine" does not include any vehicle that is used exclusively in the business of funeral directing. (MM) "Manufactured home" has the same meaning as in division (C)(4) of section 3781.06 of the Revised Code. (NN) "Acquired situs," with respect to a manufactured home or a mobile home, means to become located in this state by the placement of the home on real property, but does not include the placement of a manufactured home or a mobile home in the inventory of a new motor vehicle dealer or the inventory of a manufacturer, remanufacturer, or distributor of manufactured or mobile homes. (OO) "Electronic" includes electrical, digital, magnetic, optical, electromagnetic, or any other form of technology that entails capabilities similar to these technologies. (PP) "Electronic record" means a record generated, communicated, received, or stored by electronic means for use in an information system or for transmission from one information system to another. (QQ) "Electronic signature" means a signature in electronic form attached to or logically associated with an electronic record. (RR) "Financial transaction device" has the same meaning as in division (A) of section 113.40 of the Revised Code. (SS) "Electronic motor vehicle dealer" means a motor vehicle dealer licensed under Chapter 4517. of the Revised Code whom the registrar of motor vehicles determines meets the criteria designated in section 4503.035 of the Revised Code for electronic motor vehicle dealers and designates as an electronic motor vehicle dealer under that section. (TT) "Electric personal assistive mobility device" means a self-balancing two non-tandem wheeled device that is designed to transport only one person, has an electric propulsion system of an average of seven hundred fifty watts, and when ridden on a paved level surface by an operator who weighs one hundred seventy pounds has a maximum speed of less than twenty miles per hour. (UU) "Limited driving privileges" means the privilege to operate a motor vehicle that a court grants under section 4510.021 of the Revised Code to a person whose driver's or commercial driver's license or permit or nonresident operating privilege has been suspended. (VV) "Utility vehicle" means a self-propelled vehicle designed with a bed, principally for the purpose of transporting material or cargo in connection with construction, agricultural, forestry, grounds maintenance, lawn and garden, materials handling, or similar activities. (WW) "Low-speed vehicle" means a three- or four-wheeled motor vehicle with an attainable speed in one mile on a paved level surface of more than twenty miles per hour but not more than twenty-five miles per hour and with a gross vehicle weight rating less than three thousand pounds. (XX) "Under-speed vehicle" means a three- or four-wheeled vehicle, including a vehicle commonly known as a golf cart, with an attainable speed on a paved level surface of not more than twenty miles per hour and with a gross vehicle weight rating less than three thousand pounds. (YY) "Motor-driven cycle or motor scooter" means any vehicle designed to travel on not more than three wheels in contact with the ground, with a seat for the driver and floor pad for the driver's feet, and is equipped with a motor with a piston displacement between fifty and one hundred cubic centimeters piston displacement that produces not more than five brake horsepower and is capable of propelling the vehicle at a speed greater than twenty miles per hour on a level surface. (ZZ) "Motorcycle" means a motor vehicle with motive power having a seat or saddle for the use of the operator, designed to travel on not more than three wheels in contact with the ground, and having no occupant compartment top or occupant compartment top that can be installed or removed by the user. (AAA) "Cab-enclosed motorcycle" means a motor vehicle with motive power having a seat or saddle for the use of the operator, designed to travel on not more than three wheels in contact with the ground, and having an occupant compartment top or an occupant compartment top that is installed. (BBB) "Mini-truck" means a vehicle that has four wheels, is propelled by an electric motor with a rated power of seven thousand five hundred watts or less or an internal combustion engine with a piston displacement capacity of six hundred sixty cubic centimeters or less, has a total dry weight of nine hundred to two thousand two hundred pounds, contains an enclosed cabin and a seat for the vehicle operator, resembles a pickup truck or van with a cargo area or bed located at the rear of the vehicle, and was not originally manufactured to meet federal motor vehicle safety standards. (CCC) "Autocycle" means a three-wheeled motorcycle that is manufactured to comply with federal safety requirements for motorcycles and that is equipped with safety belts, a steering wheel, and seating that does not require the operator to straddle or sit astride to ride the motorcycle. (DDD) "Plug-in hybrid electric motor vehicle" means a passenger car powered in part by a battery cell energy system that can be recharged via an external source of electricity. (EEE) "Hybrid motor vehicle" means a passenger car powered by an internal propulsion system consisting of both of the following: (1) A combustion engine; (2) A battery cell energy system that cannot be recharged via an external source of electricity but can be recharged by other vehicle mechanisms that capture and store electric energy. (FFF) "Low-speed micromobility device" means a device weighing less than one hundred pounds that has handlebars, is propelled by an electric motor or human power, and has an attainable speed on a paved level surface of not more than twenty miles per hour when propelled by the electric motor. (GGG) "Specialty license plate" means a license plate, authorized by the general assembly, that displays a combination of words, markings, logos, or other graphic artwork that is in addition to the words, images, and distinctive numbers and letters required by section 4503.22 of the Revised Code. (HHH) "Battery electric motor vehicle" means a passenger car powered wholly by a battery cell energy system that can be recharged via an external source of electricity. (III) "Adaptive mobility vehicle" means a passenger car or bus that is designed, modified, or equipped to enable an individual with a disability to operate or to be transported in the passenger car or bus, in accordance with 49 C.F.R. part 568 or 595, and contains at least one of the following: (1) An electronic or mechanical lift that enables a person to enter or exit the motor vehicle while occupying a wheelchair or scooter; (2) An electronic or mechanical wheelchair ramp; (3) A system to secure a wheelchair or scooter in order to allow a person to operate or be transported safely while occupying that wheelchair or scooter. (JJJ) "Replica motor vehicle" means a motor vehicle that is constructed, assembled, or modified so as to replicate the make, model, and model year of a motor vehicle that is at least twenty-five years old. (KKK) "Legal presence" means that an individual is authorized to reside in the United States either permanently or for a temporary period, as evidenced through proof of citizenship or other appropriate legal documents issued by the United States citizen and immigration services and verified through the systematic alien verification for entitlements system. (LLL) "Temporary lawful status" means that an individual has a recognizable legal status with the United States for a temporary period as evidenced by the appropriate legal documents issued by the United States citizen and immigration services and verified through the systematic alien verification for entitlements system. Sec. 4503.10. (A) The owner of every snowmobile, off-highway motorcycle, and all-purpose vehicle required to be registered under section 4519.02 of the Revised Code shall file an application for registration under section 4519.03 of the Revised Code. The owner of a motor vehicle, other than a snowmobile, off-highway motorcycle, or all-purpose vehicle, that is not designed and constructed by the manufacturer for operation on a street or highway may not register it under this chapter except upon certification of inspection pursuant to section 4513.02 of the Revised Code by the sheriff, or the chief of police of the municipal corporation or township, with jurisdiction over the political subdivision in which the owner of the motor vehicle resides. Except as provided in sections 4503.103 and 4503.107 of the Revised Code, every owner of every other motor vehicle not previously described in this section and every person mentioned as owner in the last certificate of title of a motor vehicle that is operated or driven upon the public roads or highways shall cause to be filed each year, by mail or otherwise, in the office of the registrar of motor vehicles or a deputy registrar, a written or electronic application or a preprinted registration renewal notice issued under section 4503.102 of the Revised Code, the form of which shall be prescribed by the registrar, for registration for the following registration year, which shall begin on the first day of January of every calendar year and end on the thirty-first day of December in the same year. Applications for registration and registration renewal notices shall be filed at the times established by the registrar pursuant to section 4503.101 of the Revised Code. A motor vehicle owner also may elect to apply for or renew a motor vehicle registration by electronic means using electronic signature in accordance with rules adopted by the registrar. Except as provided in division (J) of this section, applications for registration shall be made on blanks furnished by the registrar for that purpose, containing the following information: (1) A brief description of the motor vehicle to be registered, including the year, make, model, and vehicle identification number, and, in the case of commercial cars, the gross weight of the vehicle fully equipped computed in the manner prescribed in section 4503.08 of the Revised Code; (2) The name and residence address of the owner, and the township and municipal corporation in which the owner resides; (3) The district of registration, which shall be determined as follows: (a) In case the motor vehicle to be registered is used for hire or principally in connection with any established business or branch business, conducted at a particular place, the district of registration is the municipal corporation in which that place is located or, if not located in any municipal corporation, the county and township in which that place is located. (b) In case the vehicle is not so used, the district of registration is the municipal corporation or county in which the owner resides at the time of making the application. (4) Whether the motor vehicle is a new or used motor vehicle; (5) The date of purchase of the motor vehicle; (6) Whether the fees required to be paid for the registration or transfer of the motor vehicle, during the preceding registration year and during the preceding period of the current registration year, have been paid. Each application for registration shall be signed by the owner, either manually or by electronic signature, or pursuant to obtaining a limited power of attorney authorized by the registrar for registration, or other document authorizing such signature. If the owner elects to apply for or renew the motor vehicle registration with the registrar by electronic means, the owner's manual signature is not required. (7) The owner's social security number, driver's license number, or state identification number, or, where a motor vehicle to be registered is used for hire or principally in connection with any established business, the owner's federal taxpayer identification number. The bureau of motor vehicles shall retain in its records all social security numbers provided under this section, but the bureau shall not place social security numbers on motor vehicle certificates of registration. (8) Whether the applicant wishes to certify willingness to make an anatomical gift if an applicant has not so certified under section 2108.05 of the Revised Code. The applicant's response shall not be considered in the decision of whether to approve the application for registration. (9) Whether the applicant is a temporary resident with legal presence in the United States, and if so, a statement that the applicant shall provide documentation verifying the applicant's legal presence or continued temporary lawful status in the United States. As used in this division, "temporary resident" has the same meaning as in section 4507.01 of the Revised Code. (B)(1) When an applicant first registers a motor vehicle in the applicant's name, the applicant shall provide proof of ownership of that motor vehicle. Proof of ownership may include any of the following: (a) The applicant may present for inspection a physical certificate of title or memorandum certificate showing title to the motor vehicle to be registered in the name of the applicant. (b) The applicant may present for inspection an electronic certificate of title for the applicant's motor vehicle in a manner prescribed by rules adopted by the registrar. (c) The registrar or deputy registrar may electronically confirm the applicant's ownership of the motor vehicle. An applicant is not required to present a certificate of title to an electronic motor vehicle dealer acting as a limited authority deputy registrar in accordance with rules adopted by the registrar. (2) When a motor vehicle inspection and maintenance program is in effect under section 3704.14 of the Revised Code and rules adopted under it, each application for registration for a vehicle required to be inspected under that section and those rules shall be accompanied by an inspection certificate or alternative emissions certificate for the motor vehicle issued in accordance with that section. (3) An application for registration shall be refused if any of the following applies: (a) The application is not in proper form. (b) The application is prohibited from being accepted by division (D) of section 2935.27, division (A) of section 4503.13, division (B) of section 4510.22, division (D) of section 4503.234, division (B)(1) of section 4521.10, or division (B) of section 5537.041 of the Revised Code. (c) Proof of ownership is required but is not presented or confirmed in accordance with division (B)(1) of this section. (d) All registration and transfer fees for the motor vehicle, for the preceding year or the preceding period of the current registration year, have not been paid. (e) The owner or lessee does not have an inspection certificate or alternative emissions certificate for the motor vehicle as provided in section 3704.14 of the Revised Code, and rules adopted under it, if that section is applicable. (f) The applicant does not have legal presence or continued temporary lawful status in the United States. (4) This section does not require the payment of license or registration taxes on a motor vehicle for any preceding year, or for any preceding period of a year, if the motor vehicle was not taxable for that preceding year or period under sections 4503.02, 4503.04, 4503.11, 4503.12, and 4503.16 or Chapter 4504. of the Revised Code. (5) When a certificate of registration is issued upon the first registration of a motor vehicle by or on behalf of the owner, the official issuing the certificate shall indicate the issuance with a stamp on the certificate of title or memorandum certificate or, in the case of an electronic certificate of title or electronic verification of ownership, an electronic stamp or other notation as specified in rules adopted by the registrar, and with a stamp on the inspection certificate for the motor vehicle, if any. (6) The official also shall indicate, by a stamp or by other means the registrar prescribes, on the registration certificate issued upon the first registration of a motor vehicle by or on behalf of the owner the odometer reading of the motor vehicle as shown in the odometer statement included in or attached to the certificate of title. Upon each subsequent registration of the motor vehicle by or on behalf of the same owner, the official also shall so indicate the odometer reading of the motor vehicle as shown on the immediately preceding certificate of registration. (7) The registrar shall include in the permanent registration record of any vehicle required to be inspected under section 3704.14 of the Revised Code the inspection certificate number from the inspection certificate or the alternative emissions certificate number from the alternative emissions certificate that is presented at the time of registration of the vehicle as required under this division. (C)(1) The registrar and each deputy registrar shall collect the following additional fees for each application for registration and registration renewal received: (a) Except as provided in division (C)(1)(b) of this section, a fee of eleven dollars on or before December 31, 2025, and a fee of sixteen dollars on and after January 1, 2026; (b) For vehicles specified in divisions (A)(1) to (21) of section 4503.042 of the Revised Code, a fee of thirty dollars on or before December 31, 2025, and a fee of thirty-five dollars on and after January 1, 2026. No additional fee shall be charged for vehicles registered under section 4503.65 of the Revised Code. Each additional fee is for the purpose of defraying the department of public safety's costs associated with the administration and enforcement of the motor vehicle and traffic laws of Ohio. Each deputy registrar shall transmit the fees collected under divisions (C)(1) and (3) of this section in the time and manner provided in this section. The registrar shall deposit all moneys received under division (C)(1) of this section into the public safety - highway purposes fund established in section 4501.06 of the Revised Code. (2) In addition, a charge of twenty-five cents shall be made for each reflectorized safety license plate issued, and a single charge of twenty-five cents shall be made for each county identification sticker or each set of county identification stickers issued, as the case may be, to cover the cost of producing the license plates and stickers, including material, manufacturing, and administrative costs. Those fees shall be in addition to the license tax. If the total cost of producing the plates is less than twenty-five cents per plate, or if the total cost of producing the stickers is less than twenty-five cents per sticker or per set issued, any excess moneys accruing from the fees shall be distributed in the same manner as provided by section 4501.04 of the Revised Code for the distribution of license tax moneys. If the total cost of producing the plates exceeds twenty-five cents per plate, or if the total cost of producing the stickers exceeds twenty-five cents per sticker or per set issued, the difference shall be paid from the license tax moneys collected pursuant to section 4503.02 of the Revised Code. (3) The registrar and each deputy registrar shall collect the following additional fee, as applicable, for each application for registration or registration renewal received for any hybrid motor vehicle, plug-in hybrid electric motor vehicle, or battery electric motor vehicle: (a) One hundred dollars for a hybrid motor vehicle; (b) One hundred fifty dollars for a plug-in hybrid electric motor vehicle; (c) Two hundred dollars for a battery electric motor vehicle. Each fee imposed under this division shall be prorated based on the number of months for which the vehicle is registered. The registrar shall transmit all money arising from each fee to the treasurer of state for distribution in accordance with division (E) of section 5735.051 of the Revised Code, subject to division (D) of section 5735.05 of the Revised Code. (D) Each deputy registrar shall be allowed a fee equal to the amount established under section 4503.038 of the Revised Code for each application for registration and registration renewal notice the deputy registrar receives, which shall be for the purpose of compensating the deputy registrar for the deputy registrar's services, and such office and rental expenses, as may be necessary for the proper discharge of the deputy registrar's duties in the receiving of applications and renewal notices and the issuing of registrations. (E) Upon the certification of the registrar, the county sheriff or local police officials shall recover license plates erroneously or fraudulently issued. (F) Each deputy registrar, upon receipt of any application for registration or registration renewal notice, together with the license fee and any local motor vehicle license tax levied pursuant to Chapter 4504. of the Revised Code, shall transmit that fee and tax, if any, in the manner provided in this section, together with the original and duplicate copy of the application, to the registrar. The registrar, subject to the approval of the director of public safety, may deposit the funds collected by those deputies in a local bank or depository to the credit of the "state of Ohio, bureau of motor vehicles." Where a local bank or depository has been designated by the registrar, each deputy registrar shall deposit all moneys collected by the deputy registrar into that bank or depository not more than one business day after their collection and shall make reports to the registrar of the amounts so deposited, together with any other information, some of which may be prescribed by the treasurer of state, as the registrar may require and as prescribed by the registrar by rule. The registrar, within three days after receipt of notification of the deposit of funds by a deputy registrar in a local bank or depository, shall draw on that account in favor of the treasurer of state. The registrar, subject to the approval of the director and the treasurer of state, may make reasonable rules necessary for the prompt transmittal of fees and for safeguarding the interests of the state and of counties, townships, municipal corporations, and transportation improvement districts levying local motor vehicle license taxes. The registrar may pay service charges usually collected by banks and depositories for such service. If deputy registrars are located in communities where banking facilities are not available, they shall transmit the fees forthwith, by money order or otherwise, as the registrar, by rule approved by the director and the treasurer of state, may prescribe. The registrar may pay the usual and customary fees for such service. (G) This section does not prevent any person from making an application for a motor vehicle license directly to the registrar by mail, by electronic means, or in person at any of the registrar's offices, upon payment of a service fee equal to the amount established under section 4503.038 of the Revised Code for each application. (H) No person shall make a false statement as to the district of registration in an application required by division (A) of this section. Violation of this division is falsification under section 2921.13 of the Revised Code and punishable as specified in that section. (I)(1) Where applicable, the requirements of division (B) of this section relating to the presentation of an inspection certificate issued under section 3704.14 of the Revised Code and rules adopted under it for a motor vehicle, the refusal of a license for failure to present an inspection certificate or alternative emissions certificate, and the stamping of the inspection certificate or alternative emissions certificate by the official issuing the certificate of registration apply to the registration of and issuance of license plates for a motor vehicle under sections 4503.102, 4503.12, 4503.14, 4503.15, 4503.16, 4503.171, 4503.172, 4503.19, 4503.40, 4503.41, 4503.42, 4503.43, 4503.44, 4503.46, 4503.47, and 4503.51 of the Revised Code. (2)(a) The registrar shall adopt rules ensuring that each owner registering a motor vehicle in a county where a motor vehicle inspection and maintenance program is in effect under section 3704.14 of the Revised Code and rules adopted under it receives information about the requirements established in that section and those rules and about the need in those counties to present an inspection certificate or an alternative emissions certificate with an application for registration or preregistration. (b) Upon request, the registrar shall provide the director of environmental protection, or any person that has been awarded a contract under section 3704.14 of the Revised Code, an on-line computer data link to registration information for all passenger cars, noncommercial motor vehicles, and commercial cars that are subject to that section. The registrar also shall provide to the director of environmental protection a magnetic data tape containing registration information regarding passenger cars, noncommercial motor vehicles, and commercial cars for which a multi-year registration is in effect under section 4503.103 of the Revised Code or rules adopted under it, including, without limitation, the date of issuance of the multi-year registration, the registration deadline established under rules adopted under section 4503.101 of the Revised Code that was applicable in the year in which the multi-year registration was issued, and the registration deadline for renewal of the multi-year registration. (J) Subject to division (K) of this section, application for registration under the international registration plan, as set forth in sections 4503.60 to 4503.66 of the Revised Code, shall be made to the registrar on forms furnished by the registrar. In accordance with international registration plan guidelines and pursuant to rules adopted by the registrar, the forms shall include the following: (1) A uniform mileage schedule; (2) The gross vehicle weight of the vehicle or combined gross vehicle weight of the combination vehicle as declared by the registrant; (3) Any other information the registrar requires by rule. (K) The registrar shall determine the feasibility of implementing an electronic commercial fleet licensing and management program that will enable the owners of commercial tractors, commercial trailers, and commercial semitrailers to conduct electronic transactions by July 1, 2010, or sooner. If the registrar determines that implementing such a program is feasible, the registrar shall adopt new rules under this division or amend existing rules adopted under this division as necessary in order to respond to advances in technology. If international registration plan guidelines and provisions allow member jurisdictions to permit applications for registrations under the international registration plan to be made via the internet, the rules the registrar adopts under this division shall permit such action. Sec. 4503.103. (A)(1) The registrar of motor vehicles may adopt rules to permit any person or lessee, other than a person receiving an apportioned license plate under the international registration plan or a temporary resident, who owns or leases one or more motor vehicles to file a written application for registration for no more than five succeeding registration years. The rules adopted by the registrar may designate the classes of motor vehicles that are eligible for such registration. At the time of application, all annual taxes and fees shall be paid for each year for which the person is registering. (2)(a) The registrar shall adopt rules to permit any person or lessee, other than a temporary resident, who owns or leases a trailer or semitrailer that is subject to the tax rate prescribed in either division (C)(1) or, beginning January 1, 2022, (C)(2) of section 4503.042 of the Revised Code to file a written application for registration for any number of succeeding registration years, including a permanent registration, for such trailers or semitrailers. At the time of application, the applicant shall pay all of the following: (i) As applicable, either the annual tax prescribed in division (C)(1) of section 4503.042 of the Revised Code for each year for which the applicant is registering or the annual tax prescribed in division (C)(2) of section 4503.042 of the Revised Code, unless the applicant previously paid the tax specified in division (C)(2) of that section for the trailer or semitrailer being registered. However, an applicant paying the annual tax under division (C)(1) of section 4503.042 of the Revised Code shall not pay more than eight times the annual taxes due, regardless of the number of years for which the applicant is registering. (ii) The additional fee established under division (C)(1) of section 4503.10 of the Revised Code for each year of registration, provided that not more than eight times the additional fee due shall be paid, regardless of the number of years for which the applicant is registering. (iii) One single deputy registrar service fee in the amount specified in division (D) of section 4503.10 of the Revised Code or one single bureau of motor vehicles service fee in the amount specified in division (G) of that section, as applicable, regardless of the number of years for which the applicant is registering. (b) In addition, each applicant registering a trailer or semitrailer under division (A)(2)(a) of this section shall pay any applicable local motor vehicle license tax levied under Chapter 4504. of the Revised Code for each year for which the applicant is registering, provided that not more than eight times any such annual local taxes shall be due upon registration. (c) The period of registration for a trailer or semitrailer registered under division (A)(2)(a) of this section is exclusive to the trailer or semitrailer for which that certificate of registration is issued and is not transferable to any other trailer or semitrailer if the registration is a permanent registration. (3) Except as provided in division (A)(4) of this section, the registrar shall adopt rules to permit any person who owns a motor vehicle, other than a temporary resident, to file an application for registration for not more than five succeeding registration years. At the time of application, the person shall pay the annual taxes and fees for each registration year, calculated in accordance with division (C) of section 4503.11 of the Revised Code. A person who is registering a vehicle under division (A)(3) of this section shall pay for each year of registration the additional fee established under division (C)(1) or (3) of section 4503.10 of the Revised Code, as applicable. The person shall also pay the deputy registrar service fee or the bureau of motor vehicles service fee equal to the amount established under section 4503.038 of the Revised Code. (4) Division (A)(3) of this section does not apply to a person receiving an apportioned license plate under the international registration plan, or the owner of a commercial car used solely in intrastate commerce, or the owner of a bus as defined in section 4513.50 of the Revised Code. (5) A person registering a noncommercial trailer permanently shall register the trailer under section 4503.107 of the Revised Code. (B) No person applying for a multi-year registration under division (A) of this section is entitled to a refund of any taxes or fees paid. (C) The registrar shall not issue to any applicant who has been issued a final, nonappealable order under division (D) of this section a multi-year registration or renewal thereof under this division or rules adopted under it for any motor vehicle that is required to be inspected under section 3704.14 of the Revised Code the district of registration of which, as determined under section 4503.10 of the Revised Code, is or is located in the county named in the order. (D) Upon receipt from the director of environmental protection of a notice issued under rules adopted under section 3704.14 of the Revised Code indicating that an owner of a motor vehicle that is required to be inspected under that section who obtained a multi-year registration for the vehicle under division (A) of this section or rules adopted under that division has not obtained a required inspection certificate or alternative emissions certificate for the vehicle, the registrar in accordance with Chapter 119. of the Revised Code shall issue an order to the owner impounding the certificate of registration and identification license plates for the vehicle. The order also shall prohibit the owner from obtaining or renewing a multi-year registration for any vehicle that is required to be inspected under that section, the district of registration of which is or is located in the same county as the county named in the order during the number of years after expiration of the current multi-year registration that equals the number of years for which the current multi-year registration was issued. An order issued under this division shall require the owner to surrender to the registrar the certificate of registration and license plates for the vehicle named in the order within five days after its issuance. If the owner fails to do so within that time, the registrar shall certify that fact to the county sheriff or local police officials who shall recover the certificate of registration and license plates for the vehicle. (E) Upon the occurrence of either of the following circumstances, the registrar in accordance with Chapter 119. of the Revised Code shall issue to the owner a modified order rescinding the provisions of the order issued under division (D) of this section impounding the certificate of registration and license plates for the vehicle named in that original order: (1) Receipt from the director of environmental protection of a subsequent notice under rules adopted under section 3704.14 of the Revised Code that the owner has obtained the inspection certificate or alternative emissions certificate for the vehicle as required under those rules; (2) Presentation to the registrar by the owner of the required inspection certificate or alternative emissions certificate for the vehicle. (F) The owner of a motor vehicle for which the certificate of registration and license plates have been impounded pursuant to an order issued under division (D) of this section, upon issuance of a modified order under division (E) of this section, may apply to the registrar for their return. A fee of two dollars and fifty cents shall be charged for the return of the certificate of registration and license plates for each vehicle named in the application. (G) The registrar shall not issue a permanent registration or multi-year registration under this section to a temporary resident. As used in this section, "temporary resident" has the same meaning as in section 4507.01 of the Revised Code. Sec. 4503.107. (A) The Except as specified in division (F) of this section, the registrar of motor vehicles shall permit any person or lessee who owns or leases a noncommercial trailer that is subject to the tax rates prescribed in division (E) of section 4503.04 of the Revised Code to file a written application for permanent registration of that noncommercial trailer. (B)(1) At the time of application, the applicant shall pay all of the following: (a) The equivalent of eight times the standard tax established for that noncommercial trailer by division (E) of section 4503.04 of the Revised Code; (b) The equivalent of eight times the additional fee established by division (C)(1) of section 4503.10 of the Revised Code; (c) The equivalent of eight times the deputy registrar service fee or eight times the bureau of motor vehicles service fee, as applicable, equal to the amount established by section 4503.038 of the Revised Code. (2) In addition to any other prescribed tax or fee, if the noncommercial trailer registered under this section is subject to local motor vehicle taxes under Chapter 4504. of the Revised Code, the applicant shall pay the equivalent of eight times any applicable local motor vehicle license tax levied under that chapter for that noncommercial trailer. (C) Upon submission of a completed application, payment of all applicable taxes and fees, and compliance with all other applicable laws relating to the registration of motor vehicles, the registrar or deputy registrar shall issue the applicant a permanent license plate and a validation sticker. (D) The permanent registration of a noncommercial trailer under this section is exclusive to the trailer for which that certificate of registration is issued. The registration is not transferable to any other trailer. (E) No person applying for a permanent registration under this section is entitled to a refund of any taxes or fees paid. (F) The registrar shall not issue a permanent registration under this section to a temporary resident. As used in this section, "temporary resident" has the same meaning as in section 4507.01 of the Revised Code. Sec. 4506.14. (A) Commercial driver's licenses shall expire as follows: (1) Except as provided in division (A)(3) or (4) of this section, each such license issued to replace an operator's or chauffeur's license shall expire on the original expiration date of the operator's or chauffeur's license and, upon renewal, shall expire on the licensee's birthday in the fourth or eighth year after the date of issuance, based on the period of renewal requested by the applicant. A person who is sixty-five years of age or older may only apply for a commercial driver's license that expires on the birthday of the applicant in the fourth year after the date it is issued. (2)(a) Except as provided in division (A)(3) or (4) of this section, each such license issued as an original license to a person whose residence is in this state shall expire on the licensee's birthday in the fourth or eighth year after the date of issuance, based on the period of renewal requested by the applicant. A person who is sixty-five years of age or older may only apply for a commercial driver's license that expires on the birthday of the applicant in the fourth year after the date it is issued. (b) Each such license issued to a person whose temporary residence is in this state shall expire in accordance with rules adopted by the registrar of motor vehicles. A license issued to a person with a temporary residence in this state is a limited term license and may be renewed in accordance with division (C) of this section. (3) The registrar or a deputy registrar may issue a license that expires on a date earlier than the licensee's birthday in the fourth year after the date of issuance if the licensee has undergone a security threat assessment required by federal law to obtain a hazardous materials endorsement and the assessment will expire before that date. No commercial driver's license shall be issued under division (A)(3) of this section for a period longer than four years and one hundred eighty days. (4) Each such license issued to replace the operator's or chauffeur's license of a person who is less than twenty-one years of age, and each such license issued as an original license to a person who is less than twenty-one years of age, shall expire on the licensee's twenty-first birthday. (B) No commercial driver's license shall be issued for a period longer than eight years. Except as provided in section 4507.12 of the Revised Code, the registrar may waive the examination of any person applying for the renewal of a commercial driver's license issued under this chapter, provided that the applicant presents either an unexpired commercial driver's license or a commercial driver's license that has expired not more than six months prior to the date of application. (C)(1) Subject to the requirements of this chapter and except as provided in division (C)(2) of this section in regard to a person whose temporary residence is in this state, every commercial driver's license shall be renewable one hundred eighty days before its expiration upon payment of the fees required by section 4506.08 of the Revised Code. Each person applying for renewal or transfer of a commercial driver's license shall complete the application form prescribed by section 4506.07 of the Revised Code and shall provide all certifications required. (2)(a) Except as provided in division (C)(2)(b) of this section, a limited term commercial driver's license shall not be issued to a temporary resident for a period longer than the expiration date of the temporary resident's authorized stay in the United States, or for four years one year from the date of issuance, whichever date is earliest. (b) If there is no expiration date for a temporary resident's authorized stay in the United States, a limited term commercial driver's license shall not be issued to the temporary resident for a period longer than one year from the date of issuance. (c) A limited term commercial driver's license may be renewed within one hundred eighty days prior to its expiration upon the applicant's presentation of documentation verifying the applicant's legal presence or continued temporary lawful status in the United States. (3) Prior to applying for renewal of a commercial driver's license, each applicant shall submit a new copy or original medical examiner's certificate required by section 4506.10 of the Revised Code; if the person's medical status has changed, the registrar shall take the appropriate action to address the change in medical status. If the person wishes to retain an endorsement authorizing the person to transport hazardous materials, the person shall take and successfully complete the written test for the endorsement and shall submit to any background check required by federal law. (D) Each person licensed as a driver under this chapter shall notify the registrar of any change in the person's address within ten days following that change. The notification shall be in writing on a form provided by the registrar and shall include the full name, date of birth, license number, county of residence, social security number, and new address of the person. (E) Whoever violates division (D) of this section is guilty of a minor misdemeanor. Sec. 4507.09. (A)(1) Except as provided in division (B) of this section, every driver's license issued to a resident of this state expires on the birthday of the applicant in the fourth or eighth year after the date it is issued, based on the period of renewal requested by the applicant. A resident who is sixty-five years of age or older may only apply for a driver's license that expires on the birthday of the applicant in the fourth year after the date it is issued. In no event shall any license be issued for a period longer than eight years and ninety days. Subject to the requirements of section 4507.12 of the Revised Code, every driver's license issued to a resident is renewable at any time prior to its expiration. (2) A driver's license issued to a temporary resident shall expire in accordance with rules adopted by the registrar of motor vehicles. A driver's license issued to a temporary resident is a limited term license, but may be renewed within ninety days prior to its expiration in accordance with division (E) of this section. (3) No refund shall be made or credit given for the unexpired portion of the driver's license that is renewed. The registrar shall notify each person whose driver's license has expired within forty-five days after the date of expiration. Notification shall be made by regular mail sent to the person's last known address as shown in the records of the bureau of motor vehicles. Failure to provide such notification shall not be construed as a renewal or extension of any license. (4) For the purposes of this section, the date of birth of any applicant born on the twenty-ninth day of February shall be deemed to be the first day of March in any year in which there is no twenty-ninth day of February. (B) Every driver's license or renewal of a driver's license issued to a resident applicant who is sixteen years of age or older, but less than twenty-one years of age, expires on the twenty-first birthday of the applicant, except that an applicant who applies no more than thirty days before the applicant's twenty-first birthday shall be issued a license in accordance with division (A) of this section. (C) Each person licensed as a driver under this chapter shall notify the registrar of any change in the person's address within ten days following that change. The notification shall be in writing on a form provided by the registrar and shall include the full name, date of birth, license number, county of residence, social security number, and new address of the person. The registrar shall offer the person the opportunity to submit a notice of change of address for voter registration purposes by electronic means in conjunction with the person's transaction with the registrar, in accordance with section 3503.11 of the Revised Code. (D) No driver's license shall be renewed when renewal is prohibited by division (A) of section 4507.091 of the Revised Code. (E)(1) Except as provided in division (E)(2) of this section, a limited term license shall not be issued to a temporary resident for a period longer than the expiration date of the temporary resident's authorized stay in the United States, or for four years one year from the date of issuance, whichever date is earliest. (2) If there is no expiration date for a temporary resident's authorized stay in the United States, a limited term license shall not be issued to the temporary resident for a period longer than one year from the date of issuance. (3) A limited term license may be renewed within ninety days prior to its expiration upon the applicant's presentation of documentation verifying the applicant's legal presence or continued temporary lawful status in the United States. (4) In accordance with Chapter 119. of the Revised Code, the registrar shall adopt rules governing limited term licenses for temporary residents. Sec. 4507.501. (A) An identification card issued to a resident shall expire, unless canceled or surrendered earlier, on the birthday of the cardholder in the fourth or the eighth year after the date on which it is issued, based on the period of renewal requested by the applicant. (B) A temporary identification card issued to a resident shall expire on the earliest of the following dates: (1) After the effective dates of the suspension or cancellation of the cardholder's driver's or commercial driver's license; (2) The birthday of the cardholder in the fourth year after the date on which it is issued. (C)(1) Subject to rules adopted under division (D) of this section, a limited term identification card issued to a temporary resident who has a definite expiration date for the resident's authorized stay in the United States shall expire on the earliest of the following dates: (a) The expiration date of the applicant's authorized stay in the United States; (b) Four years One year from the date of issuance. (2) Subject to rules adopted under division (D) of this section, a limited term identification card issued to a temporary resident who has no expiration date for the applicant's authorized stay in the United States shall expire one year from the date of issuance. (D) The registrar of motor vehicles shall adopt rules in accordance with Chapter 119. of the Revised Code governing limited term identification cards for temporary residents and limited term temporary identification cards for temporary residents. (E) A cardholder may renew the cardholder's identification card within ninety days prior to the day on which it expires by filing an application and paying the prescribed fee, if required, in accordance with section 4507.50 of the Revised Code. A limited term identification card or limited term temporary identification card may only be renewed upon verification of the applicant's continued temporary lawful status in the United States and the applicant's compliance with any other applicable requirements. Section 2. That existing sections 4501.01, 4503.10, 4503.103, 4503.107, 4506.14, 4507.09, and 4507.501 of the Revised Code are hereby repealed.